Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,125
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-2,125 to 79-2,135 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Elementary and Secondary Student Fee Authorization Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1172, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 2.